District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.24

Eligibility requirements for alien children.

(a)

Any person who is not a citizen of the United States, who entered the United States before August 22, 1996, and who is a “qualified alien”, as defined by § 431 of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, approved August 22, 1996 (110 Stat. 2105; 8 U.S.C. § 1641), may receive the following:

(1)

TANF benefits, if otherwise eligible under this chapter;

(2)

Medicaid benefits, if otherwise eligible under the District of Columbia State Plan submitted pursuant to title XIX of the Social Security Act, approved July 30, 1965 (79 Stat. 343; 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.); and

(3)

Benefits and services funded under title XX of the Social Security Act, approved August 13, 1981 (95 Stat. 867; 42 U.S.C. § 1397 et seq.), if otherwise eligible under applicable federal and District law.

(b)

Any person who is not a citizen of the United States and who is a “qualified alien”, as defined by § 431 of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, may receive any District-funded benefit if otherwise eligible under applicable District law, regardless of the person’s date of entry into the United States.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 524, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(aa), 46 DCR 905
This section is referenced in § 4-205.15.
1981 Ed., § 3-205.24.
D.C. Law 12-241 rewrote the section.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(aa) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(j) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(j) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(j) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(aa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(aa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(aa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(aa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).